Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-2132
Inspections; not required; when.

Nothing in the State Electrical Act shall be construed to require the work of employees of municipal corporations, public power districts, public power and irrigation districts, railroads, electric membership or cooperative associations, public utility corporations, or telephone systems to be inspected while acting within the scope of their employment.

Laws 1975, LB 525, § 32;

R.S.1943, (1976), § 81-5,102;

Laws 1993, LB 193, § 26;

Laws 2024, LB144, § 13.
July 19, 2024